Missouri, session 2026, HB2137.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 332.311, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 332.311, to read as follows:
332.311. 1. Except as provided in [subsection] subsections 2 and 3 of this section, a
duly registered and currently licensed dental hygienist may only practice as a dental hygienist
so long as the dental hygienist is employed by a dentist who is duly registered and currently
licensed in Missouri, or as an employee of such other person or entity approved by the board
in accordance with rules promulgated by the board. In accordance with this chapter and the
rules promulgated by the board pursuant thereto, a dental hygienist shall only practice under
the supervision of a dentist who is duly registered and currently licensed in Missouri, except
as provided in [subsection] subsections 2 and 3 of this section.
2. A duly registered and currently licensed dental hygienist or a dental hygienist
with a volunteer dental hygienist license may perform oral screenings, provide oral
hygiene instructions, and place fluoride varnish in any setting without the supervision of
a dentist.
3. A duly registered and currently licensed dental hygienist who has been in practice
at least three years and who is practicing in a public health setting may provide [fluoride
treatments,] teeth cleaning and sealants, if appropriate, to children who are eligible for
medical assistance, pursuant to chapter 208, without the supervision of a dentist. Medicaid
shall reimburse any eligible provider who provides [fluoride treatments,] teeth cleaning[,] and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2137 2
sealants to eligible children. Those public health settings in which a dental hygienist may
practice as described in this subsection without the supervision of a dentist shall be
established jointly by the department of health and senior services and by the Missouri dental
board by rule.
✔